Utah statutes.
13-5-9.   Limitation on quantity of article or product sold or offered for sale to any one customer.

A person may not circumvent the provisions of this chapter relating to the quantity of articles or products any one customer may purchase by requiring presentation of coupons, certificates, special purchase authorizations, or any other procedures designed in any way to limit quantity of purchases as provided herein.

